Washington statutes.
RCW 36.69.430

Joint park and recreation district—Formation—Petition.

The formation of a joint park and recreation district shall be initiated by a petition as prescribed in RCW 36.69.020. The petition shall be filed with the county auditor of one of the counties within which a portion of the proposed joint district is located. A copy of the petition shall be filed with the county auditor of the other county or counties within which a portion of the proposed joint district is located. The county auditors shall jointly certify the sufficiency or insufficiency of the petition to the legislative authorities of the counties.

[ 1979 ex.s. c 11 s 2.]

NOTES:

Severability—1979 ex.s. c 11: See note following RCW 36.69.420.